Missouri, session 2026, HB1772.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 453.073, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 453.073, to read as follows:
453.073. 1. The children's division is authorized to grant a subsidy to a child in one
of the forms of allotment defined in section 453.065. Determination of the amount of
monetary need is to be made by the division at the time of placement, if practicable, and in
reference to the needs of the child, including consideration of the physical and mental
condition, and age of the child in each case; provided, however, that the subsidy amount shall
not exceed the expenses of foster care and medical care for foster children paid under the
homeless, dependent and neglected foster care program.
2. Beginning January 1, 2015, subsidy agreements entered into under this section
shall include a provision allowing for the suspension or redirection of subsidy payments in the
event that the child has been:
(1) Adjudicated dependent and made a ward of the court under subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of section 211.031; and
(2) Removed from the physical or legal custody of the parent or parents by a court of
competent jurisdiction.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1772 2
3. The subsidy shall be paid for children who have been in the care and custody of the
children's division under the homeless, dependent and neglected foster care program. In the
case of a child who has been in the care and custody of a private child-caring or child-placing
agency or in the care and custody of the division of youth services or the department of
mental health, a subsidy shall be available from the children's division subsidy program in the
same manner and under the same circumstances and conditions as provided for a child who
has been in the care and custody of the children's division.
4. Within thirty days after the authorization for the grant of a subsidy by the children's
division, a written agreement shall be entered into by the division and the parents. The
agreement shall set forth the following terms and conditions:
(1) The type of allotment;
(2) The amount of assistance payments;
(3) The services to be provided;
(4) The time period for which the subsidy is granted, if such period is reasonably
ascertainable;
(5) The obligation of the parents to inform the division when they are no longer
providing support to the child or when events affect the subsidy eligibility of the child;
(6) The eligibility of the child for Medicaid; and
(7) That the children's division may suspend or redirect subsidy payments under
subsection 2 of this section.
5. Beginning January 1, 2027, and a for a period of five years thereafter, the
children's division shall make the grants provided for under subsection 1 of section
453.073 available to be paid toward the legal expenses incurred by the prospective
adoptive parent or parents upon the successful completion of such adoption proceedings
including, but not limited to, attorney's fees, filing fees, publication fees, and fees
associated with the submission of a certificate of decree of adoption to amend the minor
child's birth records. Such grant shall be specified in a written agreement entered into
by the children's division and the prospective adoptive parent or parents. Such grant
shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for uncontested adoptions and four
thousand dollars for contested adoptions, billed at the rate of one hundred seventy-five
dollars per hour of legal services provided by an attorney licensed to practice law in the
state of Missouri, together with actual expenses incurred in prosecuting the petition for
adoption. A separate grant for guardian ad litem fees shall be made available and shall
not exceed five hundred dollars billed at the rate of one hundred seventy-five dollars per

HB 1772 3
hour of legal services provided by an attorney licensed to practice law in the state of
Missouri.
✔